Wisconsin, session 2025, AB332.
do enact as follows:AB332,11Section 1. 346.23 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB332,3,42346.23 (1) At an intersection or crosswalk where traffic is controlled by traffic 3control signals or by a traffic officer, the operator of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-4way to stop the vehicle when a pedestrian or personal delivery device, or to a person 5who is riding a bicycle, electric scooter, or electric personal assistive mobility device 6in a manner which that is consistent with the safe use of the crosswalk by 7pedestrians, that has started to cross the highway on a green signal or a pedestrian 8signal authorizing crossing and in and shall remain stopped until the pedestrian, 9personal delivery device, bicyclist, or rider of an electric scooter or electric personal 10assistive mobility device has completed crossing the roadway. In all other cases, 11pedestrians, bicyclists, and riders of electric scooters and electric personal assistive 12mobility devices shall yield, and personal delivery device operators shall ensure 13that personal delivery devices yield, the right-of-way to vehicles lawfully proceeding 14directly ahead on a green signal. No The operator of a vehicle proceeding ahead on 15a green signal may begin a and preparing to turn at a controlled intersection or 16crosswalk when where a pedestrian, personal delivery device, bicyclist, or rider of 17an electric scooter or an electric personal assistive mobility device is crossing in the 18crosswalk on a green signal or a pedestrian signal authorizing crossing would be 19endangered or interfered with in any way shall stop the vehicle and shall remain 20stopped until the pedestrian, personal delivery device, bicyclist, or rider of an 1electric scooter or electric personal assistive mobility device has completed crossing 2the roadway. The rules stated in this subsection are modified at intersections or 3crosswalks on divided highways or highways provided with safety zones in the 4manner and to the extent stated in sub. (2).AB332,25Section 2. 346.23 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB332,3,176346.23 (2) At intersections or crosswalks on divided highways or highways 7provided with safety zones where traffic is controlled by traffic control signals or by 8a traffic officer, the operator of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to stop the 9vehicle when a pedestrian, personal delivery device, bicyclist, or rider of an electric 10scooter or an electric personal assistive mobility device that has started to cross the 11roadway either from the near curb or shoulder or from the center dividing strip or a 12safety zone with the green signal or a pedestrian signal authorizing crossing in the 13favor of the pedestrian, personal delivery device, bicyclist, or rider of an electric 14scooter or an electric personal assistive mobility device and shall remain stopped 15until the pedestrian, personal delivery device, bicyclist, or rider of an electric 16scooter or electric personal assistive mobility device has completed crossing the 17roadway.AB332,318Section 3. 346.24 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB332,4,419346.24 (1) At an intersection or crosswalk where traffic is not controlled by 20traffic control signals or by a traffic officer, the operator of a vehicle shall yield the 21right-of-way to stop the vehicle when a pedestrian or personal delivery device, or to 22a person riding a bicycle, electric scooter, or electric personal assistive mobility 23device in a manner which that is consistent with the safe use of the crosswalk by 1pedestrians, that is crossing the highway within a marked or unmarked crosswalk 2and shall remain stopped until the pedestrian, personal delivery device, bicyclist, or 3rider of an electric scooter or electric personal assistive mobility device has 4completed crossing the roadway.AB332,45Section 4. 346.24 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB332,4,116346.24 (2) No pedestrian, personal delivery device, bicyclist, or rider of an 7electric scooter or an electric personal assistive mobility device may suddenly leave, 8and no personal delivery device operator may allow a personal delivery device to 9suddenly leave, a curb or other place of safety and walk, run, or ride into the path of 10a vehicle which that is so close that it is difficult for the operator of the vehicle to 11yield stop.AB332,512Section 5. 346.37 (1) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB332,4,1713346.37 (1) (a) 1. Vehicular traffic facing a green signal may proceed straight 14through, make a U-turn, or turn right or left unless a sign at such place prohibits 15the turning maneuver, but, subject to s. 346.23, vehicular traffic shall yield the 16right-of-way to other vehicles and to pedestrians lawfully within the intersection or 17an adjacent crosswalk at the time the signal is exhibited.AB332,618Section 6. 346.37 (1) (c) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB332,5,1119346.37 (1) (c) 3. Vehicular traffic facing a red signal at an intersection may, 20after stopping as required under subd. 1., cautiously enter the intersection to make 21a right turn into the nearest lawfully available lane for traffic moving to the right or 22to turn left from a one-way highway into the nearest lawfully available lane of a 23one-way highway on which vehicular traffic travels to the left. Vehicular traffic in 1the leftmost right-turn lane of a roadway that provides 2 right-turn lanes may make 2a right turn on a red signal into a lawfully available lane that is 2nd to the 3rightmost lane for traffic moving to the right. Except for a vehicle turning right 4from the leftmost right-turn lane of a roadway that provides 2 right-turn lanes, no 5turn may be made on a red signal if lanes of moving traffic are crossed. No turn 6may be made on a red signal if a sign at the intersection prohibits the turn on a red 7signal. In Subject to s. 346.23, in making a turn on a red signal vehicular traffic 8shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians, personal delivery devices, bicyclists, and 9riders of electric scooters and electric personal assistive mobility devices lawfully 10within a crosswalk, to operators of vehicles making a lawful U-turn, and to other 11traffic lawfully using the intersection.AB332,712Section 7. 346.37 (1) (c) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:AB332,6,213346.37 (1) (c) 4. Notwithstanding subd. 1., a motorcycle, moped, motor bicycle, 14or bicycle facing a red signal at an intersection may, after stopping as required 15under subd. 1. for not less than 45 seconds, proceed cautiously through the 16intersection before the signal turns green if no other vehicles are present at the 17intersection to actuate the signal and the operator of the motorcycle, moped, motor 18bicycle, or bicycle reasonably believes the signal is vehicle actuated. The Subject to 19s. 346.23, the operator of a motorcycle, moped, motor bicycle, or bicycle proceeding 20through a red signal under this subdivision shall yield the right-of-way to any 21vehicular traffic, pedestrian, personal delivery device, bicyclist, or rider of an 22electric scooter or an electric personal assistive mobility device proceeding through 23a green signal at the intersection or lawfully within a crosswalk or using the 1intersection. This subdivision does not affect any authorization for a bicyclist under 2subd. 2.AB332,83Section 8. 346.37 (1) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB332,6,114346.37 (1) (d) 1. Vehicular traffic facing a green arrow signal may enter the 5intersection to make the movement indicated by the arrow but, subject to s. 346.23, 6shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians, personal delivery devices, bicyclists, and 7riders of electric scooters and electric personal assistive mobility devices lawfully 8within a crosswalk and to other traffic lawfully using the intersection. Vehicular 9traffic facing a left turn arrow may make a U-turn unless a sign prohibits U-turns. 10When the green arrow signal indicates a right or left turn traffic shall cautiously 11enter the intersection.AB332,912Section 9. 346.37 (1) (e) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB332,6,1913346.37 (1) (e) 1. Vehicular traffic facing a flashing yellow arrow signal may 14cautiously enter the intersection to make the movement indicated by the arrow but, 15subject to s. 346.23, shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians, personal delivery 16devices, bicyclists, and riders of electric scooters and electric personal assistive 17mobility devices lawfully within a crosswalk and to other traffic lawfully using the 18intersection. Vehicular traffic facing a left turn arrow may make a U-turn unless a 19sign prohibits U-turns.AB332,1020Section 10. Initial applicability.AB332,7,221(1) This act first applies to offenses committed on the effective date of this 22subsection but does not preclude the counting of other convictions as prior 23convictions for purposes of sentencing by a court, administrative action by the 1department of transportation, or suspension or revocation of motor vehicle 2operating privileges.AB332,7,33